Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
10G

MOTORCYCLE
AND MOTOR SCOOTER INSURANCE

Case Notes

The plain language of this chapter as well as its legislative
history disqualified plaintiff, who was injured by someone operating a
motorcycle, from no-fault benefits. 91 H. 299 (App.), 983 P.2d 200.

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§431:10G-101 Definitions. As used in
this article:

"Accidental harm" means bodily
injury, death, sickness, or disease caused by a motorcycle or motor scooter
accident to a person.

"Injury" means accidental harm not
resulting in death.

"Motorcycle" has the meaning
prescribed by section 286-2.

"Motorcycle accident" means an
accident arising out of the operation, maintenance, or use of a motorcycle, but
not involving a motor vehicle.

"Motor scooter" has the meaning
prescribed by section 286-2.

"Motor scooter accident" means an
accident arising out of the operation, maintenance, or use of a motor scooter,
but not involving a motor vehicle.

"Owner" means a person who holds the
legal title to a motorcycle or motor scooter; except that when a motorcycle or
motor scooter is the subject of a security agreement or lease with a term of
not less than one year, with the debtor or lessee having the right of
possession, the term owner shall mean the debtor or lessee. Whenever transfer
of title to a motorcycle or motor scooter occurs, the seller shall be
considered the owner until delivery of the executed title to the buyer. Upon
delivery of the executed title, the buyer holding the equitable title shall be
considered the owner.

"Person" means, when appropriate to
the context, not only individuals, but corporations, firms, associations, and
societies. [L 1989, c 208, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next